Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2738HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 944 Section 1. Section 476.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The following persons are entitled 3 as of right to intervene in any proceeding conducted by the 4 commission: 5 a. A member of the general assembly. 6 b. An elected county or city official. 7 c. Any resident with a minimally plausible interest in the 8 proceeding. 9